Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 5. Bonds.

§ 21-33-301.
Uniform system for issuance of municipal bonds; purposes for which bonds may be issued.

The governing authorities of any municipality are authorized to issue negotiable bonds of the municipality to raise money for the following purposes:

Erecting municipal buildings, armories, auditoriums, community centers, gymnasiums and athletic stadiums, preparing and equipping athletic fields, and purchasing buildings or land therefor, and for repairing, improving, adorning and equipping the same, and for erecting, equipping and furnishing of buildings to be used as a municipal or civic arts center;

Erecting or purchasing waterworks, gas, electric and other public utility plants or distribution systems or franchises, and repairing, improving and extending the same;

Purchasing or constructing, repairing, improving and equipping buildings for public libraries and for purchasing land, equipment and books therefor, whether the title to same be vested in the municipality issuing such bonds or in some subdivision of the state government other than the municipality, or jointly in such municipality and other such subdivision;

Establishing sanitary, storm, drainage or sewerage systems, and repairing, improving and extending the same;

Protecting a municipality, its streets and sidewalks from overflow, caving banks and other like dangers;

Constructing, improving or paving streets, sidewalks, driveways, parkways, walkways or public parking facilities, and purchasing land therefor;

Purchasing land for parks, cemeteries and public playgrounds, and improving, equipping and adorning the same, including the constructing, repairing and equipping of swimming pools and other recreational facilities;

Constructing bridges and culverts;

Constructing, repairing and improving wharves, docks, harbors and appurtenant facilities, and purchasing land therefor;

Constructing, repairing and improving public slaughterhouses, markets, pest houses, workhouses, hospitals, houses of correction, reformatories and jails in the corporate limits, or within three (3) miles of the corporate limits, and purchasing land therefor;

Altering or changing the channels of streams and water courses to control, deflect or guide the current thereof;

Purchasing fire-fighting equipment and apparatus, and providing housing for same, and purchasing land therefor;

Purchasing or renting voting machines and any other election equipment needed in elections held in the municipality;

Assisting the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management of the Governor’s Office of General Services, or any other state agency in acquiring a site for, constructing suitable buildings and runways and equipping an airport for the university or other state-supported four-year college, now or hereafter in existence, in or near which the municipality is located, within not more than ten (10) miles of the municipality;

Acquiring and improving existing mass transit system; however, no municipal governing authorities shall authorize any bonds to be issued for the acquiring and improving of an existing mass transit system unless an election be conducted in said municipality in the same manner provided for general and special elections, and a majority of the qualified electors of the municipality participating in said election approve the bond issuance for the acquiring and improving of an existing mass transit system;

Purchasing machinery and equipment which have an expected useful life in excess of ten (10) years. The life of such bonds shall not exceed the expected useful life of such machinery and equipment. Machinery and equipment shall not include any motor vehicle weighing less than twelve thousand (12,000) pounds;

A project for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity has been obtained by the municipality pursuant to the Regional Economic Development Act.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3014; 1906, § 3415; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5968; 1930, § 2483; 1942, § 3598-01; Laws, 1914, ch. 147; Laws, 1928, ch. 207; Laws, 1930, ch. 79; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 1; Laws, 1954, ch. 360, § 28; Laws, 1957, Ex. Sess., ch. 13, § 6; Laws, 1966, ch. 598, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 400, § 1; Laws, 1973, ch. 424, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 464; Laws, 1987, ch. 360; Laws, 2000, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 47, eff from and after passage (approved Aug. 30, 2000.).

§ 21-33-303.
Limitation of indebtedness.

No municipality shall hereafter issue bonds secured by a pledge of its full faith and credit for the purposes authorized by law in an amount which, when added to the then outstanding bonded indebtedness of such municipality, shall exceed either (a) fifteen percent (15%) of the assessed value of the taxable property within such municipality, according to the last completed assessment for taxation, or (b) ten percent (10%) of the assessment upon which taxes were levied for its fiscal year ending September 30, 1984, whichever is greater. In computing such indebtedness, there may be deducted all bonds or other evidences of indebtedness, heretofore or hereafter issued, for school, water, sewerage systems, gas, and light and power purposes and for the construction of special improvements primarily chargeable to the property benefited, or for the purpose of paying the municipality’s proportion of any betterment program, a portion of which is primarily chargeable to the property benefited. However, in no case shall any municipality contract any indebtedness which, when added to all of the outstanding general obligation indebtedness, both bonded and floating, shall exceed either (a) twenty percent (20%) of the assessed value of all taxable property within such municipality according to the last completed assessment for taxation or (b) fifteen percent (15%) of the assessment upon which taxes were levied for its fiscal year ending September 30, 1984, whichever is greater. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to apply to contract obligations in any form heretofore or hereafter incurred by any municipality which are subject to annual appropriations therefor, or to bonds heretofore issued by any municipality for school purposes, or to contract obligations in any form heretofore or hereafter incurred by any municipality which are payable exclusively from the revenues of any municipally-owned utility, or to bonds issued by any municipality under the provisions of Sections 57-1-1 through 57-1-51, or to any special assessment improvement bonds issued by any municipality under the provisions of Sections 21-41-1 through 21-41-53, or to any indebtedness incurred under Section 55-23-8.

All bonds issued prior to July 1, 1990, pursuant to this chapter by any municipality for the purpose of the constructing, replacing, renovating or improving wastewater collection and treatment facilities in order to comply with an administrative order of the Mississippi Department of Natural Resources issued pursuant to the Federal Water Pollution Control Act and amendments thereto, are hereby exempt from the limitation imposed by this section if the governing body of the municipality adopts an order, resolution or ordinance to the effect that the rates paid by the users of such facilities shall be increased to the extent necessary to provide sufficient funds for the payment of the principal of and interest on such bonds as each respectively becomes due and payable as well as the necessary expenses in connection with the operation and maintenance of such facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 5969, 5971; Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069p; 1930, §§ 2484, 2485; 1942 § 3598-02; Laws, 1914, ch. 147; Laws, 1920, ch. 169; Laws, 1932, ch. 235; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 2; Laws, 1955, Ex. Sess., ch. 96; Laws, 1962, ch. 555; Laws, 1982, ch. 347, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 476, § 2; Laws, 1987, ch. 424, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 516, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 499 § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 526, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 401, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 602, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 16, 2001.).

§ 21-33-305.
Revenues of public utilities may be pledged for payment of bonds.

Whenever bonds shall be issued for the construction or purchase of waterworks, gas, light and power plants, or distribution systems, the governing authorities of the municipality so issuing them may provide by ordinance, contract or otherwise, that such bonds shall be secured by a pledge of the revenue of the utility to be constructed or purchased with the proceeds thereof, which pledge of revenue shall be in addition to the pledge of the full faith and credit of such municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 5973; 1930, § 2486; 1942, § 3598-03; Laws, 1914, ch. 147; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-307.
Initiating procedures for issuance of bonds.

Before issuing any bonds for any of the purposes enumerated in Section 21-33-301, the governing authority of the issuing municipality shall adopt a resolution declaring its intention so to do, stating the amount of bonds proposed to be issued and the purpose for which the bonds are to be issued, and the date upon which the aforesaid authority proposes to direct the issuance of such bonds. Such resolution shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such municipality. The first publication of such resolution shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed in such resolution for the issuance of the bonds, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper be published in such municipality, then such notice shall be given by publishing the resolution for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such municipality and, in addition, by posting a copy of such resolution for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding the date fixed therein at three (3) public places in such municipality. The publication of the resolution may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19. If ten percent (10%) of the qualified electors of the municipality, or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is the lesser, shall file a written protest against the issuance of such bonds on or before the date specified in such resolution, then an election on the question of the bonds shall be called and held as is provided in Section 21-33-309. Notice of such election shall be signed by the clerk of the municipality and shall be published once a week for at least three (3) consecutive weeks in at least one (1) newspaper published in such municipality. The first publication of such notice shall be made not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date fixed for such election, and the last publication shall be made not more than seven (7) days prior to such date. If no newspaper is published in such municipality, then such notice shall be given by publishing the same for the required time in some newspaper having a general circulation in such municipality and published in the same or an adjoining county and, in addition, by posting a copy of such notice for at least twenty-one (21) days next preceding such election at three (3) public places in such municipality. If no protest be filed, then such bonds may be issued without an election on the question of the issuance thereof, at any time within a period of two (2) years after the date specified in the above-mentioned resolution. However, the governing authority of any municipality in its discretion may nevertheless call an election on such question, in which event it shall not be necessary to publish the resolution declaring its intention to issue such bonds as herein provided.

Under no circumstances shall any municipality exceed the bond limit as set by statute for municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069l; 1930, § 2489; 1942, § 3598-05; Laws, 1920, ch. 206; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 5; Laws, 1966, ch. 599, §§ 1-4; Laws, 1988, ch. 457, § 7, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 21-33-309.
Holding of bond election.

The election provided for by Section 21-33-307 shall be held, as far as is practicable, in the same manner as other elections are held in municipalities. At such election, all qualified electors of such municipality may vote. The ballots used at such election shall have printed thereon a brief statement of the amount and purpose of the proposed bond issue and the words “FOR THE BOND ISSUE” and “AGAINST THE BOND ISSUE,” and the voter shall vote by placing a cross (X) or check mark (Π) opposite his choice on the proposition.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069m; 1930, § 2490; Codes, 1942, § 3598-06; Laws, 1920, ch. 206; Laws, 1942, ch. 230; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-311.
Results of election.

When the results of the election on the question of the issuance of such bonds shall have been canvassed by the election commissioners of such municipality and certified by them to the governing authorities of such municipality, it shall be the duty of such governing authorities to determine and adjudicate whether or not three-fifths of the qualified electors who voted in such election voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds. Unless three-fifths of the qualified electors who voted in such election shall have voted in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then such bonds shall not be issued. Should three-fifths of the qualified electors who vote in such election vote in favor of the issuance of such bonds, then the governing authorities of the municipality may issue such bonds, either in whole or in part, within two years from the date of such election or within two years after the final favorable termination of any litigation affecting the issuance of such bonds, as such governing authorities shall deem best.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069n; 1930, § 2491; 1942, § 3598-08; Laws, 1920, ch. 206; Laws, 1932, ch. 222; Laws, 1935, ch. 64; Laws, 1938, ch. 136; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess., ch. 73; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-313.
Details of municipal bonds; supplemental powers conferred in issuance of bonds.

All bonds issued pursuant to this article shall be lithographed or engraved, and printed in two (2) or more colors, to prevent counterfeiting, and shall be in such denominations as shall be specified by the governing authorities of the municipality. Such bonds shall be registered as issued, be numbered in a regular series from one (1) upward, and every such bond shall specify on its face the purpose for which it was issued and the total amount authorized to be issued, and shall be made payable to bearer. Interest shall be evidenced by proper coupons thereto attached. The governing authorities of such municipality shall annually levy a special tax upon all of the taxable property within the municipality, which shall be sufficient to provide for the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds according to the terms thereof.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, bonds referred to hereinabove may be issued pursuant to the supplemental powers and authorizations conferred by the provisions of the Registered Bond Act, being Sections 31-21-1 through 31-21-7.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1892, § 3015; 1906, § 3416; Hemingway’s 1917, § 5975; 1930, § 2487; 1942, § 3598-04; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 4; Laws, 1972, ch. 388, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 494, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 11, 1983).

§ 21-33-315.
Maturities and interest.

All bonds issued by a municipality shall mature annually, with all maturities not longer than twenty (20) years, with not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue to mature each year during the first five (5) years of the life of such bonds, not less than one-twenty-fifth (1/25) of the total issue to mature each year during the succeeding ten-year period of the life of such bonds, and the remainder to be amortized, as to principal and interest, into approximately equal annual payments, one (1) payment to mature each year for the remaining life of such bonds. However, in cases where bonds shall be issued or dated subsequent to the date fixed for making the municipal tax levy in the year in which such bonds are to be issued, the first maturity date of not less than one-fiftieth (1/50) of the total issue, may be fixed for any period not exceeding two (2) years from the date of the bonds with the same schedule of subsequent maturities as herein above set forth. Such bonds shall not bear a greater overall maximum interest rate to maturity than that allowed in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972. No bond shall bear more than one (1) rate of interest. Each bond shall bear interest from its date to its stated maturity date at the interest rate specified in the bid. All bonds of the same maturity shall bear the same rate of interest from date to maturity. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually, except that the first interest coupon attached to any such bond may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year.

No interest payment shall be evidenced by more than one (1) coupon and neither cancelled nor supplemental coupons shall be permitted. The lowest interest rate specified for any bonds issued shall not be less than seventy percent (70%) of the highest interest rate specified for the same bond issue. The interest rate of any one (1) interest coupon shall not exceed the maximum interest rate allowed on such bonds.

Each interest rate specified in any bid must be in multiples of one-eighth of one percent (1/8 of 1%) or in multiples of one-tenth of one percent (1/10 of 1%). The denomination, form, and place, or places, of payment of such bonds shall be fixed in the resolution or ordinance of the governing authorities issuing such bonds. Such bonds shall be executed by the manual or facsimile signature of the mayor and clerk of such municipality, with the seal of the municipality affixed thereto. At least one (1) signature on each bond shall be a manual signature, as specified in the resolution. The coupons may bear only the facsimile signatures of such mayor and clerk. No bonds shall be issued and sold under the provisions of this article for less than par and accrued interest.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069n; 1930, § 2491; Codes, 1942, § 3598-09; Laws, 1920, ch. 206; Laws, 1932, ch. 222; Laws, 1935, ch. 64; Laws, 1938, ch. 136; Laws, 1938, Ex. Sess., ch. 73; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 9; Laws, 1958, ch. 511; Laws, 1970, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 380; Laws, 1976, ch. 489; Laws, 1980, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 471, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 8; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 25, 1983).

§ 21-33-317.
Proceeds of bonds not to be diverted.

The proceeds of any bonds issued by a municipality shall be placed in the municipal treasury or depository, if there be one, as a special fund, and shall be used for no other purpose than that for which such bonds were authorized to be issued. If the governing authorities of such municipality, or any member thereof, or any other officer, shall wilfully divert, or aid or assist in diverting any such fund, or any part thereof, to any purpose other than that for which such bonds were authorized to be issued, then such person shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be punished by imprisonment in the state penitentiary for a term not exceeding five years and, in addition, he shall be liable personally and on his official bond for the amount so diverted. Any member of such governing authorities may escape the penalty provided for above by requesting and having his vote recorded in the negative on any illegal diversion of the proceeds of such bonds.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1921 Supp. § 6069o; 1930, § 2492; 1942, § 3598-10; Laws, 1920, ch. 206; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-319.
Transfer of residue of bond proceeds.

Whenever a balance shall remain of the proceeds of any bond issue after the purpose for which such bonds were issued shall have been accomplished, such balance shall forthwith be transferred to the bond and interest fund applicable to such bond issue.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3598-11; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-321.
Bond and interest fund may be used to buy outstanding bonds.

Whenever there shall be on hand in any bond and interest fund an amount in excess of the amount which will be required for expenditure therefrom within the then next succeeding twelve months, the governing authorities of the municipality may use such excess amount to purchase the outstanding bonds of such municipality which are payable from such fund whenever, in the judgment of the governing authorities, the best interest of the municipality would be served thereby. When such bonds are purchased, they shall be cancelled and retired and shall not thereafter be resold or reissued.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3598-12; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-323.
Investment of surplus funds.

Whenever any municipality shall have on hand any bond and interest funds, any funds derived from the sale of bonds, special funds, or any other funds in excess of the sums which will be required for immediate expenditure and which are not needed or cannot by law be used for the payment of the current obligations or expenses of such municipality, the governing authorities of such municipality shall have the power and authority to invest such excess funds in any bonds or other direct obligations of the United States of America or the State of Mississippi, or of any county or municipality of this state, or of any school district, which such county or municipal or school district bonds have been approved by a reputable bond attorney or have been validated by a decree of the chancery court, or in obligations issued or guaranteed in full as to principal and interest by the United States of America which are subject to a repurchase agreement with a qualified depository. In any event the bonds or obligations in which such funds are invested shall mature or be redeemable prior to the time the funds so invested will be needed for expenditure.

However, such excess funds may first be offered for investment in interest-bearing accounts with or through municipal depositories serving in accordance with Section 27-105-353 at a rate of interest not less than a simple interest rate numerically equal to the average bank discount rate on United States Treasury bills of comparable maturity. The rate of interest established herein shall be the minimum rate of interest and there shall be no maximum rate of interest.

Such excess funds may also be invested in interest-bearing accounts in or through state depositories located in such municipality to the same extent as such depositories are eligible for invested state funds.

When bonds or other obligations have been so purchased, the same may be sold or surrendered for redemption at any time by order or resolution of the governing authorities of the municipality, and the mayor of the municipality, when authorized by such order or resolution, shall have the power and authority to execute all instruments and take such other action as may be necessary to effectuate the sale or redemption thereof.

When such bonds or other obligations are sold or redeemed, the proceeds thereof, including accrued interest thereon, shall be paid into the same fund as that from which the investment was made and shall in all respects be dealt with as are other monies in such fund.

Except as hereinafter provided, any interest derived from the investments authorized in this section may, as an alternative, be deposited into the general fund of the municipality. Any interest derived from the investment of sums received under the terms of the federal State and Local Fiscal Assistance Act of 1972 and any subsequent revisions or reenactments of that act shall be paid into the same fund as that from which the investment was made. Any interest derived from the investment of school bond funds shall be handled as provided in Section 37-59-43. Any interest derived from investment of other bond proceeds or from investment of any bond and interest fund, bond reserve fund or bond redemption sinking fund shall be deposited either in the same fund from which the investment was made or in the bond and interest fund established for payment of the principal or interest on the bonds. Any interest derived from special purpose funds which are outside the function of general municipal government shall be paid into that special purpose fund.

The authority granted by this section shall be cumulative and in addition to any other law relating to the investment of funds by municipalities.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s, 1917, §§ 5893, 5894; 1930, §§ 2503, 2504; 1942, § 3598-14; Laws, 1914, ch. 154; Laws, 1934, ch. 327; Laws, 1942, ch. 225; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 14; Laws, 1952, ch. 377; Laws, 1975, ch. 421; Laws, 1977, ch. 426, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 393, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 416, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 426, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 413, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 21-33-325.
Borrowing in anticipation of taxes.

The governing authorities of any municipality of this state shall have the power and authority to borrow money for the current expenses of such municipality in anticipation of the ad valorem taxes to be collected for the then current fiscal year. The governing authority of the municipality may borrow such money, as hereinbefore provided, from any available fund in the municipal treasury, or from any other source, and such loan shall be repaid in the manner herein provided. The money so borrowed shall bear interest at a rate not greater than that allowed in Section 75-17-105, Mississippi Code of 1972, and shall be repaid not later than the following March 15, out of the first moneys collected by reason of the tax levy in anticipation of which such money is borrowed, and such money shall be used for no other purpose than the payment of the current expenses of such municipality. The amount borrowed under the provisions of this section shall in no event exceed fifty percent (50%) of the anticipated, but then uncollected, revenue to be produced by the then current tax levy, or levies, against which such money is borrowed. In borrowing money under the provisions hereof, it shall not be necessary to publish notice of intention so to do or to secure the consent of the qualified electors, either by election or otherwise. Such borrowing may be authorized by resolution of the governing authorities and may be evidenced by a negotiable note, or notes, signed and executed in such form as may be prescribed in such resolution. Money may be borrowed in anticipation of ad valorem taxes under the provisions of this section, regardless of whether or not such borrowing shall create an indebtedness in excess of statutory limitations.

Money may likewise be borrowed by the governing authorities of any municipality, as herein provided, for the purpose of paying current interest maturities on any bonded indebtedness of such municipality in anticipation of the collection of taxes for the retirement of such bonded indebtedness and the payment of any interest thereon.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hemingway’s 1917, § 6068; 1930, §§ 2500, 2501, 2502; 1942 § 3598-13; Laws, 1916, ch. 150; Laws, 1918, ch. 178; Laws, 1926, ch. 272; Laws, 1934, ch. 320; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 13; Laws, 1981, ch. 462, § 4; Laws, 1982, ch. 434, § 9; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 13; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 530, eff from and after passage (approved April 20, 1987).

§ 21-33-325.1.
Borrowing in anticipation of taxes by certain municipalities.

The governing authorities of a municipality that was formerly a census-designated place, as identified by the United States Census Bureau, and is incorporated during calendar year 2011, 2012 or 2013, shall have the power and authority to borrow money for the current expenses of the municipality from the date of incorporation in anticipation of the ad valorem taxes to be collected for the then current fiscal year and the next succeeding fiscal year. The governing authorities of the municipality may borrow such money from any available fund in the municipal treasury, or from any other source, and such loan shall be repaid in the manner provided in subsection (2) of this section.

The money borrowed shall bear interest at a rate not greater than that allowed in Section 75-17-105 and shall be repaid not later than the following March 15, out of the first monies collected by reason of the tax levy in anticipation of which such money is borrowed, and such money shall be used for no other purpose than the payment of the current expenses of such municipality. The amount borrowed under the provisions of this section shall in no event exceed fifty percent (50%) of the anticipated, but then uncollected, revenue to be produced by the then current tax levy, or levies, against which such money is borrowed.

In borrowing money under the provisions of this section, it shall not be necessary to publish notice of intention so to do or to secure the consent of the qualified electors, either by election or otherwise. Such borrowing may be authorized by resolution of the governing authorities and may be evidenced by a negotiable note, or notes, signed and executed in such form as may be prescribed in such resolution. Money may be borrowed in anticipation of ad valorem taxes under the provisions of this section, regardless of whether or not such borrowing shall create an indebtedness in excess of statutory limitations.

Money may likewise be borrowed by the governing authorities of any municipality, as herein provided, for the purpose of paying current interest maturities on any bonded indebtedness of such municipality in anticipation of the collection of taxes for the retirement of such bonded indebtedness and the payment of any interest thereon.

No governing authorities of a municipality shall borrow money or incur indebtedness as prescribed in this section after March 1, 2014.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 485, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 322, § 1; Laws, 2011, ch. 321, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 3, 2011.).

§ 21-33-326.
Borrowing in anticipation of confirmed federal grants or loans.

Any city, town or village that shall have received a binding commitment from the United States of America, or any agency thereof, or the State of Mississippi, or any agency thereof, for a grant or loan may borrow money in anticipation of receipt of funds from such confirmed grant or loan unless prohibited by federal law or by the terms of the agreement concerning such grant or loan and may assign and pledge as security for such interim financing the proceeds of any such grant or loan. The governing authority of the municipality may borrow such money, as hereinbefore provided, from any available fund in the municipal treasury, or from any other source, and such loan shall be repaid in the manner herein provided.

Such interim financing shall be upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the issuing entity and the party advancing such interim funds or the purchaser of the obligations evidencing such indebtedness; provided, however, that the principal on any such loan shall be repaid within a reasonable time after receipt of funds from the United States of America, or from the State of Mississippi, or any agency thereof, the anticipation of which gave rise to said interim financing, and provided that the interest rate on such interim financing shall not exceed that allowed in Section 75-17-107, Mississippi Code of 1972.

In borrowing money under the provisions hereof, it shall not be necessary to publish notice of intention so to do or to secure the consent of the qualified electors, either by election or otherwise. Such borrowing may be authorized by resolution of the governing authority of the issuing entity and may be evidenced by a negotiable note or notes in such form as may be prescribed in such resolution. The indebtedness incurred under this section shall not be considered when computing any limitation of indebtedness of the issuing entity established by law.

Such borrowing, whether or not evidenced by a negotiable note or notes, may be placed or sold at public or private sales for such price and in such manner and from time to time as may be determined by the issuing entity, and the issuing entity may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions which its governing body may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance thereof.

Such borrowing shall be limited to the sum of: (a) the amount of the confirmed grant or loan; (b) the amount of interest payable on such interim financing; and (c) the reasonable cost of incurring such indebtedness or issuing the note or notes evidencing such indebtedness. All moneys borrowed under the authority of this section shall be secured by and repaid from the grant or loan proceeds, earnings on the investment of the grant or loan proceeds and the proceeds of the interim financing, and from any other proceeds, revenues or earnings received by the issuing entity in connection with such grant or loan or with the interim financing, and may be further secured by and repaid from available revenues of a municipally owned utility.

In the event grant or loan proceeds pledged to the repayment of the interim financing have not been received in time to pay at maturity all or a portion of the principal of and interest on the indebtedness incurred pursuant to this section, the issuing entity may borrow additional moneys pursuant to this section in anticipation of the aforesaid grant or loan proceeds in order to pay at maturity the outstanding principal and interest on the indebtedness previously incurred, provided that the indebtedness originally incurred shall be promptly repaid upon receipt of proceeds of such subsequent borrowing. The issuing entity may enter into agreements with one or more lenders obligating such lenders to provide such additional financing upon such terms and conditions as may be agreed upon by the issuing entity and the lenders.

The issuing entity borrowing money under the provisions of this section may employ a fiscal adviser under the terms and conditions provided in Section 21-27-45.

This section, without reference to any other statute, shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the borrowing of such funds and the issuance of a note or notes to evidence such indebtedness, and shall be construed as an additional and alternative method therefor, and none of the present restrictions, requirements, conditions or limitations of law applicable to the issuance or sale of bonds, notes or other obligations by the issuing entity in this state shall apply to the borrowing of funds under this section, and no proceedings shall be required for the borrowing of such funds other than those provided for and required herein, and all powers necessary to be exercised in order to carry out the provisions of this section are hereby conferred; provided further, that powers herein granted shall refer only to notes issued in anticipation of confirmed grants or loans as provided hereinabove.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1975, ch. 493, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1980, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 451, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 541, § 14; Laws, 1985, ch. 519, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1985.

§ 21-33-327.
Incurring of indebtedness.

No interest-bearing indebtedness shall hereafter be incurred by any municipality, except in the manner hereinabove provided, or as may otherwise be provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3598-15; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 15; eff from and after July 1, 1950.

§ 21-33-329.
Application of article.

This article shall be applicable to all municipalities of this state, whether operating under the code charter, the commission form of government, a special charter, or any other form of government, and regardless of whether or not the provisions of any special charter shall contain conflicting or contrary provisions.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3598-16; Laws, 1950, ch. 493, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1950.